RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
Adamkus/D
afazija/D
aguonius/D
aiļæ½umas/D
aklys/D
akupresļæ½ra/D
alļæ½ja/D
aliejus/D
Alminta/D
Amarilļæ½/D
analitikļæ½/D
angliavandenilis/D
Antaninļæ½s/D
antkremzlis/D
antļæ½alas/D
apatinis/BDN
apiplyļæ½ļæ½lļæ½/D
apyvartos/D
Apolinarija/D
apskurļæ½lļæ½/D
arbatmedis/D
arkivyskupas/D
artikulas/D
ļæ½sinis/D
aļæ½trumas/D
atestatas/D
atletas/D
atpildas/D
atļæ½ylis/D
atvelykis/D
Audrļæ½nas/D
auklļæ½tinļæ½/D
aulinukas/D
autobusiukas/D
autoveļæ½imļæ½lis/D
Azerbaidļæ½anas/D
bailumas/D
balastas/D
baltakaklļæ½/D
baltnugaris/D
bandļæ½ius/D
Barkinta/D
barļæ½a/D
bavarļæ½/D
Beinoras/D
bendrakelionļæ½/D
berberas/D
besmegenis/D
Bijotai/D
birļæ½a/D
Byrgirda/D
blogybļæ½/D
Bosnija/D
bretonas/D
bronchas/D
Budrius/D
Buknaiļæ½iai/D
buriatļæ½/D
Butginas/D
Cecilius/D
ļæ½eslovas/D
choristļæ½/D
ļæ½inļæ½iberas/D
ļæ½iuoļæ½ikļæ½/D
dagynas/D
Daiva/D
Dangļæ½/D
Dargailas/D
darļæ½as/D
daugiastaklininkas/D
Daugvydļæ½/D
debesuotumas/D
Deimantas/D
delnļæ½/D
derintoja/D
destrukcija/D
diaskopas/D
diendarļæ½is/D
dilikas/D
dirvaļæ½olļæ½/D
dizenterija/D
dogmatiļæ½kumas/D
dorļæ½nļæ½/D
dramaturgija/D
drļæ½gmingumas/D
droļæ½lļæ½/D
dļæ½dmaiļæ½is/D
dumblialaiļæ½kis/D
durlļæ½/D
dvejetukininkas/D
dvivietininkļæ½/D
Edgaras/D
egzema/D
Eigaudļæ½/D
eiliuotoja/D
Eisvydas/D
ekonomļæ½/D
ekspresionistļæ½/D
elektronas/D
ļæ½mļæ½jas/D
epopļæ½ja/D
Erta/D
etiketļæ½/D
Eļæ½erļæ½lis/D
faneruotļæ½/D
Feliksas/D
filodendras/D
fleitininkas/D
forumas/D
fuga/D
Gailļæ½/D
gaiļæ½ulys/D
galugerklis/D
gamtotvarka/D
gargļæ½diļæ½kļæ½/D
gastrolļæ½s/D
gausmas/D
Gedvaldas/D
Geivyda/D
geltonļæ½emis/D
geometrļæ½/D
Gerta/D
gidļæ½/D
giminingumas/D
Ginvyda/D
girnelļæ½/D
gyslelļæ½/D
glamonļæ½/D
gniutulas/D
Gotautļæ½/D
gramzda/DENX
Graļæ½mantas/D
grļæ½smingumas/D
Grinkiļæ½kis/D
grotelļæ½s/D
gruļæ½ulis/D
gulstinļæ½/D
Gustis/D
Hektoras/D
hidrolis/D
hotentotļæ½/D
ideologija/D
Igliauka/D
ikrius/D
Ilļæ½ļæ½/D
Ina/D
infarktininkļæ½/D
insekticidas/D
intymumas/D
ļæ½riļæ½alas/D
iļæ½blankļæ½lļæ½/D
iļæ½gaiļæ½a/D
iļæ½kelļæ½/D
iļæ½lepļæ½lļæ½/D
ļæ½sprļæ½dis/D
iļæ½taisa/D
iļæ½verstakis/D
ļæ½varļæ½a/D
yrininkļæ½/D
Jaugilas/D
jautakis/D
Joginļæ½/D
Jorigis/D
Jovyda/D
junkumas/D
juodļæ½emis/D
jļæ½rligļæ½/D
kadaras/D
Kaiļæ½iadorys/D
kalbotyrininkas/D
Kalnaberļæ½ļæ½/D
kalvynas/D
Kanada/D
kanopa/D
kapoklļæ½/D
kardininkas/D
Karklļæ½nai/D
Kartena/D
kaskadininkļæ½/D
katorgininkas/D
kavalerija/D
keiksmininkļæ½/D
kelnaitļæ½s/D
kerļæ½/D
Kļæ½stautas/D
kiaulialiuobļæ½/D
kiemas/D
kilnotoja/D
kintiļæ½kis/D
kirtimas/D
klaidatikystļæ½/D
klastuolļæ½/D
Kleopas/D
klyksmas/D
kniauklļæ½/D
koduotļæ½/D
kolonializmas/D
kompanionļæ½/D
kondicija/D
Konstantinava/D
koordinatorļæ½/D
kortelļæ½/D
Kozmas/D
kratumas/D
krekumas/D
krikļæ½tavardis/D
kryptininkas/D
Kruonis/D
kuipis/D
kļæ½ma/D
kuosa/D
Kurkleliai/D
kvailystļæ½/D
kvorta/D
laikraļæ½tininkas/D
Laisvļæ½nas/D
lamstas/D
lapkritinļæ½/D
Laukuva/D
Leckava/D
lekalas/D
lengvatikļæ½/D
lepļæ½ynļæ½/D
Liaudvilļæ½/D
lietingumas/D
limfmazgis/D
Linvyda/D
liudijimas/D
Lybiļæ½kiai/D
lyrika/D
lotynistļæ½/D
luotas/D
Magļæ½nai/D
majoras/D
malkakirtys/D
maniakļæ½/D
Manvilas/D
Markas/D
maļæ½ina/D
matuoklis/D
maļæ½ybļæ½/D
medgalys/D
medļæ½iotojas/D
meleta/D
mentļæ½/DNPXcjkl
meļæ½kļæ½nas/D
metisas/D
miegpuvys/D
mikrodalelļæ½/D
Milius/D
mineralogija/D
Mintautas/D
miļæ½kininkystļæ½/D
modernizacija/D
moliuskas/D
morfijus/D
Mozļæ½/D
murzlas/D
nabagļæ½/D
Namgaudļæ½/D
narsliukas/D
naujakurļæ½/D
nebylumas/D
nekantruolļæ½/D
nenoras/D
neregystļæ½/D
nesvarumas/D
niaukumas/D
nimbas/D
Nogintļæ½/D
Norvaiļæ½as/D
nugarplauka/D
nuodytojas/D
nuomininkas/D
nuotaka/D
nusiļæ½engļæ½lis/D
obojininkļæ½/D
okupacija/D
optikas/D
orkestrantas/D
oļæ½kanagļæ½/D
paļæ½iauļæ½ka/DENX
padļæ½kļæ½lļæ½/D
pagrļæ½ļæ½a/D
pajuoka/D
pakiluma/D
pakulinis/BDN
paleistuvis/D
palļæ½kana/D
pampeklis/D
pantomima/D
papurgalvis/D
pardavļæ½jas/D
partiļæ½kumas/D
paļæ½arininkļæ½/D
pasimetļæ½lis/D
paslanka/D
pastiebļæ½lis/D
patarmļæ½/D
patrulļæ½/D
pavargļæ½lis/D
paļæ½aida/D
pļæ½domatis/D
pelkļæ½tyrininkas/D
pepinas/D
perkarļæ½ļæ½lļæ½/D
persenļæ½lis/D
perversmininkļæ½/D
pieninļæ½/D
pikas/D
piktļæ½olļæ½/D
pilvakalbys/D
pirkinys/D
pitekantropas/D
plaļæ½iaburnis/D
plaukiotoja/D
plļæ½ļæ½ikas/D
pliurza/D
plļæ½drumas/D
poetika/D
Polikarpas/D
popiermedis/D
posluoksnis/D
pozuotoja/D
pralaida/D
prarļæ½ļæ½as/D
precendentas/D
presuotoja/D
priekabumas/D
priesaga/D
prieļæ½tarautoja/D
priklydļæ½lļæ½/D
produkcija/D
propanas/D
protoplazma/D
publicistas/D
puma/D
puputis/D
pusdalyvis/D
puskvaiļæ½is/D
pusļæ½varkis/D
puvumas/D
radviliļæ½kietļæ½/D
rainļæ½/D
raktas/D
rangovļæ½/D
rļæ½stas/D
raudonuodegļæ½/D
reakcija/D
reformistļæ½/D
rejestras/D
remontas/D
reputacija/D
revoliucionierius/D
riedmuļæ½a/D
Rimgaudas/D
riļæ½ulys/D
ryļæ½tas/ADNQ
rotatorius/D
rudmļæ½sļæ½/D
rumbuotinļæ½/D
Ruslanas/D
sagļæ½/D
ļæ½akniapjovļæ½/D
saldymedis/D
salpas/D
sambļæ½vis/D
Sandra/D
santaika/DN
sļæ½raļæ½as/D
ļæ½aļæ½kininkas/D
saugotojas/D
sausarankis/D
sļæ½varļæ½a/D
savitaka/D
sļæ½dļæ½sena/D
sļæ½jinukas/D
sekvestras/D
senļæ½/D
ļæ½epetinukas/D
ļæ½ermukļæ½ninļæ½/D
ļæ½eļæ½tokas/D
siaurukalnļæ½/D
sienlaikraļæ½tis/D
Siksta/D
ļæ½ilsamanļæ½/D
simpatingumas/D
ļæ½ipulys/D
ļæ½iukļæ½liaveļæ½is/D
siutulys/D
skaistgirietļæ½/DN
skandis/D
skeltukas/D
skļæ½tiklis/D
Skirtautas/D
skleistļæ½/D
skrajutļæ½/D
skudurininkas/D
ļæ½lamutis/D
ļæ½leivļæ½/D
ļæ½lykļæ½tumas/D
smagratis/D
smļæ½lis/D
ļæ½mukļæ½tumas/D
ļæ½nicelis/D
sodietis/D
sominis/D
sparnelis/D
spindesys/D
sportbatis/D
sprunklis/D
stabilizatorius/D
ļæ½tangininkas/D
stearinas/D
stibyna/D
stiprļæ½nas/D
stotas/D
striukumas/D
ļæ½turmas/D
sugestyvumas/D
ļæ½ukuotoja/D
sļæ½nelis/D
suodys/D
surogatas/D
ļæ½utnumas/D
svainis/D
ļæ½vedriļæ½kļæ½/D
svetimtautļæ½/D
Svirkantļæ½/D
taburetļæ½/D
talija/D
tanklaivis/D
tarpatramis/D
tarpumas/D
taļæ½ytojas/D
Tautgintļæ½/D
technologija/D
teletaipas/D
teplumas/D
Tetervinai/D
tikļæ½tinumas/D
tinkuotoja/D
tyļæ½ininkas/D
tolmantļæ½/D
trainija/D
traļæ½kalas/D
trepkuvienļæ½/D
trinkis/D
trivamzdis/BDN
trumparegis/BDN
Tulvirdas/D
turnikas/D
tvarslas/D
udmurtļæ½/D
ļæ½kvedyba/D
uogienļæ½/D
urdulys/D
uļæ½auļæ½ļæ½lļæ½/D
uļæ½kalbļæ½toja/D
Uļæ½lieknļæ½/D
uļæ½sakovas/D
uļæ½uoglauda/D
vadybininkļæ½/D
Vaidminas/D
vaikuotļæ½/D
vaisintoja/D
Vaitnorļæ½/D
valcuotojas/D
valinys/D
Valtrļæ½da/D
vandentraukis/D
varguolļæ½/D
varovas/D
varļæ½ytininkas/D
vaļæ½iuotojas/D
veiksmaļæ½odis/D
vļæ½liava/D
Venciļæ½nai/D
verksnumas/D
vertumas/D
vļæ½ļæ½lys/D
vidurļæ½emis/D
viengungiļæ½kumas/D
vieļæ½butininkas/D
vikris/D
vilkaduobļæ½/D
vilnonas/D
virbgalys/D
virsmas/D
Visaginas/D
viļæ½tininkas/D
Vydas/D
vynininkļæ½/D
Vytļæ½/D
vokiļæ½kumas/D
ļæ½adalas/D
ļæ½aismingumas/D
ļæ½ambas/D
ļæ½ļæ½sinukas/D
ļæ½emalļæ½/D
Zenius/D
ļæ½idinys/D
ļæ½ilis/D
ļæ½ioplļæ½/D
ļæ½iļæ½rovļæ½/D
ļæ½ygvilas/D
ļæ½meļæ½ara/D
zoologļæ½/D
ļæ½uvautojas/D
ļæ½varbumas/D
ļæ½vyninukas/D
